Hawaii statutes.
§587A-27 Service plan. (a) The
service plan shall provide:

(1) The specific steps necessary to facilitate the
return of the child to a safe family home, if the proposed placement of the
child is in foster care under foster custody. These specific steps shall
include treatment and services that will be provided, actions completed,
specific measurable and behavioral changes that must be achieved, and
responsibilities assumed;

(2) Whether an ohana conference will be conducted for
family finding and family group decision making;

(3) The respective responsibilities of the child, the
parents, legal guardian or custodian, the department, other family members, and
treatment providers, and a description and expected outcomes of the services
required to achieve the permanency goal;

(4) The required frequency and types of contact
between the assigned social worker, the child, and the family;

(5) The time frames during which services will be
provided, actions must be completed, and responsibilities must be discharged;

(6) Notice to the parents that their failure to
substantially achieve the objectives described in the service plan within the
time frames established may result in termination of their parental rights;

(7) Notice to the parents that if the child has been
in foster care under the responsibility of the department for an aggregate of
fifteen out of the most recent twenty-two months from the child's date of entry
into foster care, the department is required to file a motion to set a
termination of parental rights hearing, and the parents' failure to provide a
safe family home within two years from the date when the child was first placed
under foster custody by the court, may result in the parents' parental rights
being terminated; and

(8) Any other terms and conditions that the court or
the authorized agency deem necessary to the success of the service plan.

(b) Services and assistance to the family that
are required by a service plan shall be presented in a manner that can be
understood by and does not overwhelm the parties.

(c) The court shall ensure that each term,
condition, and consequence of the service plan has been thoroughly explained
to, understood by, and agreed to by each member of the child's family whom the
authorized agency deems to be necessary to the success of the service plan.
The court shall thereafter order the service plan into effect and order the
distribution of copies to each family member or person who is a party to the
service plan. If a member of a child's family whom the authorized agency deems
to be necessary to the success of the service plan cannot understand or refuses
to agree to the terms, conditions, and consequences of the service plan, the
court shall conduct a hearing to determine the terms, conditions, and consequences
of a service plan that will ensure a safe home for the child. [L 2010, c 135,
pt of §1; am L 2011, c 51, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next